District of Columbia statutes.
5-601

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designated agent.

(2)

The term “person” means an individual, firm, partnership, joint stock company, corporation, association, incorporated society, statutory or common-law trust, estate, executor, administrator, receiver, trustee, conservator, liquidator, committee, assignee, officer, employee, principal, or agent.

History

Aug. 17, 1978, D.C. Law 2-100, § 2, 25 DCR 288

Cross References

Health care assistance, reimbursement, right of District, see § 4-609.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-501.
1973 Ed., § 4-1001.